District of Columbia statutes.
32-331.01

Grant and contract authority.

The Rehabilitation Services Program may:

(1)

Receive and administer grants, as necessary, to provide services to assist individuals with disabilities in achieving or maintaining gainful employment; and

(2)

Enter into contracts or other agreements, as necessary, to provide services or support to assist individuals with disabilities in achieving or maintaining gainful employment.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-332, § 2a
as added Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 5002, 54 DCR 7052
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5002 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
Short title: Section 5001 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle A of title V of the act may be cited as the “Rehabilitation Services Program Amendment Act of 2007”.